Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
503B

TIME SHARE
COMMISSIONERS OF DEEDS

Section

503B-1 Commissioners; appointment

503B-2 Oath and seal

503B-3 Powers; charges

503B-4 Records

503B-5 Instructions

503B-6 Construction of statutes

503B-7 Notice of legal effect

503B-8 Bond

503B-9 Liabilities; limitations on; official bond

503B-10 Fees and administrative fines

503B-11 Rules

503B-12 Immunity

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next